n11.dix
<pardef n="nAri/_n">
        <e><p>
                <l>yu</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yaru</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>yannu</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yarannu</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>yiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yariMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>geV</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="f"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>gAgi</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="f"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>goskara</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>yarigeV</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="f"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>yarigAgi</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="f"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>yarigoskara</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ya deVseVyiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>yara deVseVyiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yariMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ya</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>yara</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yalli</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>yaralli</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>		
        <e><p>
                <l>ye</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yare</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="SrI/_n">
        <e><p>
                <l>yu</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>galYu</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>yannu</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>galYannu</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>yiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>galYiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>geV</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="m"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>gAgi</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="m"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>goskara</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>galYigeV</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="m"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>galYigAgi</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="m"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>galYigoskara</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ya deVseVyiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>galYa deVseVyiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>galYiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ya</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>galYa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yalli</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>galYalli</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>		
        <e><p>
                <l></l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>galYeV</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="nAri"><i>nAri</i><par n="nAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="vEni"><i>vEni</i><par n="nAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="SAkini"><i>SAkini</i><par n="nAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="SAsaki"><i>SAsaki</i><par n="nAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="yajamAnawi"><i>yajamAnawi</i><par n="nAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="ajji"><i>ajji</i><par n="nAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="oVdawi"><i>oVdawi</i><par n="nAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="oragiwwi"><i>oragiwwi</i><par n="nAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="kavayiwri"><i>kavayiwri</i><par n="nAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="kAwyAyani"><i>kAwyAyani</i><par n="nAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="kAmAkRi"><i>kAmAkRi</i><par n="nAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="kivudi"><i>kivudi</i><par n="nAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="kumAri"><i>kumAri</i><par n="nAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="gayyAlYi"><i>gayyAlYi</i><par n="nAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="garBavawi"><i>garBavawi</i><par n="nAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="garBiNi"><i>garBiNi</i><par n="nAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="gqhiNi"><i>gqhiNi</i><par n="nAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="geVlYawi"><i>geVlYawi</i><par n="nAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="waMgi"><i>waMgi</i><par n="nAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="wapasvini"><i>wapasvini</i><par n="nAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="waruNi"><i>waruNi</i><par n="nAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="wAtagiwwi"><i>wAtagiwwi</i><par n="nAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="wAyi"><i>wAyi</i><par n="nAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="xawwupuwri"><i>xawwupuwri</i><par n="nAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="xUxavi"><i>xUxavi</i><par n="nAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="xevaxAsi"><i>xevaxAsi</i><par n="nAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="xoVreVsAni"><i>xoVreVsAni</i><par n="nAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="Xarmapawni"><i>Xarmapawni</i><par n="nAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="narwaki"><i>narwaki</i><par n="nAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="nAgavalli"><i>nAgavalli</i><par n="nAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="nAxini"><i>nAxini</i><par n="nAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="nAyakasAni"><i>nAyakasAni</i><par n="nAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="nAyaki"><i>nAyaki</i><par n="nAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="pawni"><i>pawni</i><par n="nAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="puRpAvawi"><i>puRpAvawi</i><par n="nAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="pOwri"><i>pOwri</i><par n="nAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="preyasi"><i>preyasi</i><par n="nAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="bANaMwi"><i>bANaMwi</i><par n="nAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="bAlaki"><i>bAlaki</i><par n="nAri/_n"/></e>
<e lm="SrI"><i>SrI</i><par n="SrI/_n"/></e>
